createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_CNJ_oo.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: maajiibatooyaan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg: maajiibatooyan 
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl: maajiibatooyaang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl: maajiibatooyang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl: maajiibatooyeg
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: maajiibatood
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: maajiibatoowaad
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: maajiibatoonid
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: maajiibatoonid
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X: maajiibatoong
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg: maajiibatoosiwaan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg: maajiibatoosiwan 
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl: maajiibatoosiwaang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl: maajiibatoosiwang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl: maajiibatoosiweg
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: maajiibatoosig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: maajiibatoosigwaa
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: maajiibatoosinig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: maajiibatoosinig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X: maajiibatoosing
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg: maajiibatooyaambaan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg: maajiibatooyamban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl: maajiibatooyaangiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl: maajiibatooyangiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl: maajiibatooyegiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: maajiibatoopan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: maajiibatoowaapan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: maajiibatoonipan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: maajiibatoonipan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X: maajiibatoongiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg: maajiibatoosiwaambaan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg: maajiibatoosiwamban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl: maajiibatoosiwaangiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl: maajiibatoosiwangiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl: maajiibatoosiwegiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: maajiibatoosigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: maajiibatoosigwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: maajiibatoosinigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: maajiibatoosinigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X: maajiibatoosingiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg: maajiibatoowaanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg: maajiibatoowanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl: maajiibatoowaangen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl: maajiibatoowangen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl: maajiibatoowegwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: maajiibatoogwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: maajiibatoowaagwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: maajiibatoonigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: maajiibatoonigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X: maajiibatoowiingen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg: maajiibatoosiiwaanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg: maajiibatoosiiwanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl: maajiibatoosiiwaangen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl: maajiibatoosiiwangen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl: maajiibatoosiiwegwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: maajiibatoosiigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: maajiibatoosiiwaagwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: maajiibatoosiinigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: maajiibatoosiinigwen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X: maajiibatoosiiwiingen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+1Sg: maajiibatoowaambaanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+2Sg: maajiibatoowambanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+Excl: maajiibatoowaangibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+Incl: maajiibatoowangibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+2Pl: maajiibatoowegibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3SgProx: maajiibatoogobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3PlProx: maajiibatoowaagobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3SgObv: maajiibatoonigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3PlObv: maajiibatoonigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+X: maajiibatoowiingibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+1Sg: maajiibatoosiiwaambaanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+2Sg: maajiibatoosiiwambanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+Excl: maajiibatoosiiwaangibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+Incl: maajiibatoosiiwangibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+2Pl: maajiibatoosiiwegibanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3SgProx: maajiibatoosiigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3PlProx: maajiibatoosiiwaagobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3SgObv: maajiibatoosiinigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3PlObv: maajiibatoosiinigobanen
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+X: maajiibatoosiiwiingibanen
